Hawaii statutes.
§467-12 Place of business and posting of
license. (a) A licensed real estate broker shall have and maintain a
definite place of business in the State, in compliance with this chapter and
the rules of the commission, and shall display therein the real estate broker's
license and upon request make available any associating real estate
salesperson's license.

(b) No real estate broker's branch office
shall operate without a registration previously obtained under and in
compliance with this chapter and the rules of the commission. [L 1953, c 252,
§3; RL 1955, §170-11; HRS §467-12; am L 1991, c 155, §3; am L 1999, c 240, §7]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next